Maryland, session 2026, HB1569.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
26–302.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1569*

HOUSE BILL 1569
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “AUTO REPAIR OR STORAGE FACILITY” MEANS A PERSON
ENGAGED IN THE REPAIR, SERVICING, STORAGE, OR MAINTENANCE OF MOTOR
VEHICLES FOR COMPENSATION.
(II) “AUTO REPAIR OR STORAGE FACILITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE
A SELF–SERVICE STORAGE FACILITY, AS DEFINED IN § 18–501 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) “CUSTODY OR CONTROL” MEANS THE POSSESSION OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE UNDER A REPAIR ORDER, SERVICE AGREEMENT, OR OTHER
AUTHORIZATION FROM THE REGISTERED OWNER.
(B) (1) IF A PARKING CITATION IS ISSUED FOR A MOTOR VEHICLE WHILE
THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS IN THE CUSTODY OR CONTROL OF AN AUTO REPAIR OR
STORAGE FACILITY:
(I) THE REGISTERED OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE MAY NOT
BE HELD LIABLE FOR THE PARKING VIOLATION AND ANY ASSOCIATED FINE OR LATE
FEE ARISING FROM THE PARKING CITATION; AND
(II) THE AUTO REPAIR OR STORAGE FACILITY MAY BE HELD
LIABLE FOR THE PARKING VIOLATION.
(2) IT IS AN AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE TO LIABILITY FOR A PARKING
CITATION IF THE REGISTERED OWNER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE FOR WHICH THE
CITATION WAS ISSUED DEMONSTRATES THAT, AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION, THE
MOTOR VEHICLE WAS IN THE CUSTODY OR CONTROL OF AN AUTO REPAIR OR
STORAGE FACILITY.
(3) IF A REGISTERED OWNER IS FOUND TO BE NOT LIABLE FOR A
PARKING CITATION BY ASSERTING THE AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE ESTABLISHED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A COURT SHALL IMMEDIATELY WAIVE
ALL FINES AND FEES AND DISMISS THE CITATION AGAINST THE REGISTERED
OWNER, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER LIABILITY IS TRANSFERABLE TO THE AUTO
REPAIR OR STORAGE FACILITY.
(C) IF SUFFICIENT EVIDENCE IS AVAILABLE TO INDICATE THAT A MOTOR
VEHICLE WAS IN THE CUSTODY OR CONTROL OF AN AUTO REPAIR OR STORAGE
FACILITY AT THE TIME THE PARKING ENFORCEMENT AGENCY ISSUED THE
CITATION, THE PARKING ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY REISSUE THE CITATION FOR
THE PARKING VIOLATION DIRECTLY TO THE AUTO REPAIR OR STORAGE FACILITY.

HOUSE BILL 1569 3
(D) AN AUTO REPAIR OR STORAGE FACILITY MAY NOT REQUIRE A
CUSTOMER TO WAIVE THE CUSTOMER’S RIGHTS UNDER THIS SECTION AS A
CONDITION OF SERVICE.
(E) THIS SECTION DOES NOT LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OF A PARKING
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY TO ENFORCE PARKING LAWS UNDER ITS JURISDICTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.